Hawaii statutes.
[§169-2] Activities permitted in a private
agricultural park. Within a private agricultural park, pursuant to private
agreements between any or all of the parties of the private agricultural park
agreement, one or more of the parties may:

(1) Engage in the generation of electrical energy
from fossil fuel or renewable energy sources, including the use of falling
water, biomass, wind, and solar energy. Any electrical energy generated within
the boundaries of the private agricultural park, whether by a party or parties
to the agreement or through an agreement between a party or parties and a
nonparty independent energy producer, may be produced, sold, transmitted, and
consumed by any other party of the private agricultural park agreement;
provided that the electrical energy generated is used for agricultural purposes
including but not limited to the pumping of agricultural water, cooling, air
conditioning, or agricultural processing; provided further that the electrical
energy generated is used within the established boundaries of the private
agricultural park; and provided further that the transmission and distribution
system is solely owned by a party of the private agricultural park agreement;

(2) Collect, sell, and distribute cold water to any
other party of the private agricultural park agreement to operate cooling and
processing facilities for agricultural products or for air conditioning;

(3) Collect, store, sell, and distribute nonpotable
water for irrigation purposes to any other party of the private agricultural
park agreement; and

(4) Engage in any other lawful activity within the
boundaries of the private agricultural park for the benefit of one or more of
its parties. [L 2009, c 122, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next